Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 15 Capital Construction Projects

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 80 to 88, 118 to 124.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 381 to 395.

§§ 21-15-101 through 21-15-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 82, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 175, § 1, related to capital construction. For present similar provisions, see §

21-15-105

.

§ 21-15-105.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 122, § 1; 1987, ch. 218, § 2; 1988, ch. 82, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 91, § 3; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 104; 1999, ch. 170, § 202; 2001, ch. 66, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 1; 2010, ch. 37, § 1; 2011, ch. 2, § 2; repealed by 2014 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section was derived from Laws 1986, ch. 122, § 1, related to eliminating the bonded indebtedness mill levy supplement and capital leasing grant programs in school districts.

§ 21-15-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 170, § 302.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 230, § 1, related to capital construction grants and loans.

§ 21-15-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 230, § 1, required the state superintendent to establish statewide standards for the adequacy of school buildings and facilities.

§ 21-15-108.
Revenue bonds for grants and loans; refunding revenue bonds.

Before distribution to the school lands mineral royalties account under W.S. 9-4-305(b), sufficient revenues for the purposes of this section shall be deducted therefrom and credited to a bond repayment account pursuant to the terms of the resolution, indenture or other appropriate proceeding authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds under this section. The revenues deducted shall be used as provided by this section. The balance of the revenues shall be credited to the school lands mineral royalties account as provided under W.S. 9-4-305(b). After available revenues under W.S. 9-4-305(b) have been used, revenues under W.S.

21-13-301

shall also be credited, as necessary, to the bond repayment account and shall be used as provided by this section.

The school facilities commission may borrow money in a principal amount not to exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00) by the issuance from time to time of one (1) or more series of revenue bonds. The commission may encumber revenues under subsection (a) of this section for bonds in total amounts not to exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00) issued for school capital construction projects and assistance as determined by the commission and approved by the legislature under W.S.

21-15-119

. Any bonds issued under this section, together with any interest accruing thereon and any prior redemption premiums due in connection therewith, are payable and collectible solely out of revenues authorized under this section. The bondholders may not look to any general or other fund for payment of the bonds except the revenues pledged therefore. The bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness or a debt within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation. The bonds shall not be considered or held to be general obligations of the state but shall constitute its special obligations and the commission shall not pledge the state’s full faith and credit for payment of the bonds.

Bonds issued under this section shall be in a form, issued in a manner, at, above or below par at a discount not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the principal amount of the bonds, at public or private sale, and issued with recitals, terms, covenants, conditions and other provisions not contrary to other applicable statutes, as may be provided by the commission in a resolution authorizing their issuance and in an indenture or other appropriate proceedings.

Any bonds issued under this section shall:

Be of denominations of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or multiples thereof;

Be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, W.S. 34.1-1-101 through 34.1-10-104;

Mature at a time or serially at times in regular numerical order at annual or other designated intervals in amounts designated and fixed by the commission, but not exceeding thirty (30) years from their date;

Bear interest payable annually, semiannually or at other designated intervals, but the first interest payment date may be for interest accruing for any period not exceeding one (1) year;

Be made payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the state treasurer or any commercial bank or commercial banks;

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 3.

Be additionally secured by a reserve fund created from revenues deposited within the school lands mineral royalties account under W.S. 9-4-305(b) or from the proceeds of the bonds, or both, in an amount determined by the commission but not to exceed an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the revenue bonds outstanding.

Before any contract is entered into by the commission to retain the services of a financial advisor or to sell the bonds to an underwriter, whether by competitive or negotiated bid, a full disclosure of the terms of the contract including fees to be paid shall be submitted to the management council through the legislative service office.

The commission may issue refunding revenue bonds:

To refund and discharge and extend or shorten the maturities of all or any part of any outstanding bonds issued under this section including any interest thereon in arrears or about to become due;

For the purpose of reducing interest costs on bonds issued under this section or effecting other economics; or

For the purpose of modifying or eliminating any contractual limitations or provisions contained in any indenture or other proceedings authorizing outstanding bonds issued under this section.

Any refunding permitted by this subsection shall be accomplished in the manner prescribed by W.S.

16-5-101

through

16-5-119

, except any refunding revenue bonds authorized by the commission under this subsection shall not constitute an indebtedness or a debt within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation or be considered general obligations of the state. The commission shall not pledge the state’s full faith and credit to the payment of the refunding revenue bonds. The refunding revenue bonds shall constitute special obligations of the state and may be payable only from the sources authorized in this section for the payment of the bonds refunded. The principal amount of any bonds which have been refunded need not be taken into account in computing compliance with the maximum amounts of bonds authorized to be issued under this section.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 100, § 1; 1995, ch. 171, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 1999, ch. 170, § 303; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 99, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2019 ch. 204, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (d)(ii), substituted “34.1-10-104” for “34.1-10-102.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a), substituted “school lands mineral royalties account” for “public school capital construction account” throughout; and in (d)(vi), substituted “school lands mineral royalties account” for “capital construction account.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 21-15-109.
Major building and facility repair and replacement payments; computation; square footage allowance; use of payment funds; accounting and reporting requirements.

As used in this act:

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 170, § 402.

“Educational building” means a school building or facility primarily used for providing the educational programs offered by a district in compliance with law which is owned by the district, including a school building or facility owned by the district and used for operating a charter school established under W.S.

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

;

“Major building and facility repair and replacement” means the repair or replacement of complete or major portions of school building and facility systems at irregular intervals which is required to continue the use of the building or facility at its original capacity for its original intended use and is typically accomplished by contractors due to the personnel demand to accomplish the work in a timely manner, the level of sophistication of the work or the need for warranted work. The term includes the following categories as hereafter defined:

“Code compliance” means system improvements or site improvements that are mandated in writing by an authority having jurisdiction for the continued use of a school building or facility;

“Site improvements” means the repair, replacement or upgrade of those components or equipment of school district buildings and facilities that are not system improvements, including the repair, replacement or upgrade of:

Sidewalks;

Parking lots;

Athletic tracks;

Playground features;

Outdoor security features;

Landscaping;

Drainage systems; or

Similar components or equipment.

“System improvements” means the repair, replacement or upgrade of components or equipment of school district buildings, including:

Structural systems;

Fire protection systems;

Indoor security features;

Electrical, plumbing, heating, ventilation or air conditioning systems;

Roofs;

Windows;

Information technology systems; or

Similar components or equipment.

“Office building” means a school building or facility primarily used in connection with or for the purpose of district administrative functions, the major purpose or use of which is not dedicated to the provision of educational programs offered by the district in accordance with law. “Office building” shall include maintenance facilities and storage buildings in which supplies are stored;

“Portable building” means any prebuilt, factory constructed and assembled school building or facility which is transported in an assembled condition to the location on which the building or facility is to be situated and which is acquired and used by the district for temporary purposes only;

“Routine maintenance and repair” means activities necessary to keep a school building or facility in safe and good working order so that it may be used at its original or designed capacity for its originally intended purposes, including janitorial, grounds keeping and maintenance tasks done on a routine basis and typically accomplished by district personnel with exceptions for any routine tasks accomplished by contractors such as elevator or other specialized equipment or building system maintenance;

“Teacherage” means housing provided by and owned by a school district for use as living quarters of a teacher or other school district employee;

“Warehouse building” means a school building or facility primarily used for storage of equipment, materials and other district property and supplies, including facilities in which school buses are stored, maintained or serviced.

To the extent funds are available, the state construction department shall, based upon square footage computations computed from the prior school year, distribute the estimated major building and facility repair and replacement payments in quarterly installments to each school district from the school capital construction account. The department shall distribute the first quarterly payment on July 1 of each fiscal year, with the remaining payments distributed on October 1, January 2 and April 1. Payments shall be made as equal as reasonably possible. If funds within the account are not sufficient for any quarterly payment, the department shall reduce all district payments for that quarter by a uniform percentage. The department shall also increase or reduce a subsequent school district payment, as appropriate, in the event a school district receives an excessive or deficient distribution. Major building and facility repair and replacement payments shall be computed in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

To compute the major building and facility repair and replacement payment for each district, the department shall:

Determine the total number of gross square feet of school buildings and facilities within the district from the prior school year according to guidelines prescribed by rule and regulation of the commission, subject to the following:

The gross square footage of any school building or facility within the district which is not used for purposes of delivering the required educational program shall not be included within the district’s total gross square footage computed under this section, except for the square footage of any district school building or facility which would otherwise be treated as a closed building under paragraph (c)(iv) of this section, is determined to be surplus by the department or the building or facility is being used for the provision of one (1) of the programs specified in subdivisions (I) through (III) of this subparagraph and the district complies with subdivisions (IV) through (VI) of this subparagraph:

Child care programs certified to operate in Wyoming under W.S.

14-4-101

through

14-4-111

; or

Developmental preschool programs receiving state financial assistance for program operations; or

Educational programs and services provided through a board of cooperative educational services under W.S.

21-20-101

through

21-20-111

in which the district is a participant in the cooperative agreement; and

The district incorporates this use of closed or surplus buildings into its facility plans required under W.S.

21-15-116

; and

The district reports any fees or payments received or collected for this use of closed or surplus buildings as a local resource for purposes of foundation program computations under W.S. 21-13-310(a)(xv); and

The district limits the lease agreement for the use of the closed or surplus building to not more than one (1) year subject to termination by the district at any time prior to expiration of the one (1) year period if necessary for provision of district educational programs.

The gross square footage of any school building or facility leased by a district, including but not limited to the gross square footage of any school building or facility leased by a charter school operating pursuant to W.S.

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

, shall not be included within the district’s total gross square footage computed under this section, unless the district’s lease agreement is by or with any nonprofit or governmental agency providing educational programs which have been approved by the department of education, the department of health or another state or educational credentialing agency and the leased space is incorporated into the district’s facility plans required under W.S.

21-15-116

(a)(vi);

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 35, § 2.

No gross square footage created by any district enhancement shall be included within the district’s gross square footage computed under this section unless the enhancement or any portion thereof is determined to be included within the state adequacy standards pursuant to this act.

Of the total gross square feet for all school buildings and facilities computed under paragraph (c)(i) of this section, determine the total gross square feet for each of the following building categories:

Office buildings;

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 191, § 2.

Educational buildings, including buildings used for the provision of certified child care, developmental preschool or cooperative education programs pursuant to subparagraph (c)(i)(A) of this section, and including portable buildings provided portable buildings do not exceed more than ten percent (10%) of the total gross square feet computed for all school buildings and facilities under paragraph (c)(i) of this section, and excluding teacherages;

Warehouse buildings.

Except as otherwise provided by this paragraph, adjust the total amount of gross square footage determined for educational buildings under subparagraph (c)(ii)(C) of this section by excluding from computations under this section the square footage for those educational buildings closed and not operational as provided for under paragraph (c)(iv) of this section and any amount including the gross square footage of portable buildings, which exceeds capacity levels specified by this paragraph which are above the statewide minimum gross square footage criteria as prescribed by the statewide building and facility adequacy standards promulgated under W.S. 21-15-115(a). For the purpose of adjusting the gross square footage of educational buildings under this paragraph, the gross square footage of buildings used for the provision of certified child care, developmental preschool and cooperative education programs pursuant to subparagraph (c)(i)(A) of this section shall not be excluded. For purposes of this section, per student gross square footage criteria prescribed by the statewide building adequacy standards shall be based upon an average daily membership (ADM) computed as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(i) for the prior school year. For purposes of computations under this section, the allowable capacity in educational building gross square footage for each district including portable buildings but excluding buildings used for the provision of certified child care, developmental preschool and cooperative education programs pursuant to subparagraph (c)(i)(A) of this section, shall be as follows:

and (B) Repealed by Laws 2018, ch 36, § 2.

(C)

For school year 2009-2010 and each school year thereafter, up to one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the prescribed per student gross square footage criteria.

The square footage of any district building or facility which is closed and not operational, is not being replaced under a district’s facility plan under W.S. 21-15-116, is not determined surplus by the department and is specified as a closed building within the district’s facility plan as a cost efficient means to address future district building needs, shall be segregated from the square footage of other district buildings and facilities and multiplied by the replacement value under paragraph (c)(v) of this section for the appropriate building category. The resulting amount shall then be multiplied by an exterior closure factor established by the department based upon the most current edition of the Whitestone Building Maintenance and Repair Cost Reference Index and added to the total amount determined for the district under paragraph (c)(viii) of this section. This paragraph shall not apply to any school year during which the building or facility is reopened and becomes operational for purposes of delivering the required educational program within the district or to any school year during which the building or facility is used to provide certified child care, developmental preschool or cooperative education programs pursuant to subparagraph (c)(i)(A) of this section;

Multiply the adjusted square footage amount for each district’s educational buildings determined under paragraph (c)(iii) of this section and the amount determined under paragraph (c)(ii) of this section for all remaining building categories of that district, times a replacement value cost factor established for each building category by the department computed using data from August 1 of the prior school year based upon the median estimate in the most current edition of a nationally recognized, quarterly published construction cost index that provides cost indices for elementary schools, junior high schools, high schools, offices and warehouses by city or town, as modified to reflect current Wyoming construction costs determined by the department of administration and information, division of economic analysis;

Multiply the amount computed under paragraph (c)(v) of this section for the adjusted square footage of the district’s educational buildings times two and one-half percent (2.5%) for school year 2001-2002, three percent (3%) for school year 2002-2003, and by two percent (2%) for school year 2003-2004 and each school year thereafter;

Multiply the sum of the amounts obtained under paragraph (c)(v) of this section for the building categories identified under subparagraphs (c)(ii)(A) and (D) of this section times two and one-half percent (2.5%) for school year 2001-2002, three percent (3%) for school year 2002-2003, and by two percent (2%) for school year 2003-2004 and each school year thereafter, adjusted as follows:

Determine the proportion that the sum of the square footage for these building categories within the district bears to the educational building square footage computed under subparagraph (c)(ii)(C) of this section, as adjusted pursuant to paragraph (c)(iii) of this section, excluding any square footage included under paragraph (c)(iv) of this section;

If the proportion is ten percent (10%) or less, the district is entitled to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount computed under this paragraph;

If the proportion is greater than ten percent (10%) but less than sixteen percent (16%), the district is entitled to ninety percent (90%) of the amount computed under this paragraph;

If the proportion is sixteen percent (16%) or greater but less than twenty-one percent (21%), the district is entitled to eighty percent (80%) of the amount computed under this paragraph;

If the proportion is twenty-one percent (21%) or greater, the district is entitled to seventy percent (70%) of the amount computed under this paragraph.

Total the amounts computed under paragraphs (c)(iv), (vi) and (vii) of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 114, § 2.

Amounts distributed under subsection (b) of this section shall be deposited by the recipient district into a separate account, the balance of which may accumulate from year-to-year. Except as specified under subsection (f) of this section, expenditures from the separate account, including any interest earnings on the account, shall be restricted to expenses incurred for major building and facility repair and replacement as defined in subsection (a) of this section and shall be in accordance with the district’s facility plan under W.S.

21-15-116

. Account expenditures may include the expenses of district personnel performing work described under paragraph (a)(iii) of this section if approved by the department and if documented within the district’s facility plan. The district’s facility plan shall clearly specify proposed major maintenance expenditures for addressing district major building and facility repair and replacement needs on a building-by-building basis, updated for the applicable reporting period, which shall be aligned to the statewide adequacy standards and prioritized based upon the impact of the building or facility on the district’s ability to deliver the required educational program. The district shall include plans for maintaining any district building or facility which is under a lease agreement, specifying lease revenues available to the district for maintenance of facilities to the level required by statewide adequacy standards. No expenditures shall be made from the separate account unless the repair or replacement of the building or facility systems for which the expenditure is to be made is clearly specified within the district’s facility plan or otherwise approved by the department. In a manner and form required by commission rule and regulation, each district shall annually report to the department on the expenditures made from the separate account during the applicable reporting period, separating account expenditures on a building-by-building basis. The department shall annually review account expenditures and shall report expenditures to the commission and the select committee on school facilities established under W.S.

28-11-301

. The department shall compile reported building-by-building expenditure information for each district and the district facility plan and include this information in its annual report to the select committee pursuant to W.S.

21-15-121

. If any district expends funds within the separate account for purposes not authorized by this subsection or by rule and regulation of the commission, the payments for that district shall be reduced by the amount of the unauthorized expenditure in the school year following the year in which the expenditure was discovered or the school year in which notification was provided by the department, whichever first occurs.

Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, a district may expend up to ten percent (10%) of the amount distributed during any school year under subsection (b) of this section for major building and facility repair and replacement needs of the district which are not specified in the district’s facility plan, including expenditures for maintenance of district enhancements. Expenditures shall be made under this subsection only after the district’s building and facility repair and replacement needs specified in its facility plan have been addressed in accordance with subsection (e) of this section and the department has approved the district’s proposed expenditures under this subsection. Amounts not expended for purposes of this subsection during any school year may be accumulated by a district and earmarked within the separate account established under subsection (e) of this section for expenditure under this subsection in subsequent school years, provided the unexpended amount during any school year to be accumulated does not exceed ten percent (10%) of the amount distributed to the district under subsection (b) of this section for that school year. Each district shall include expenditures under this subsection and any amounts accumulated from year-to-year under this subsection within the annual report required under subsection (e) of this section. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit or limit the application of subparagraph (c)(i)(D) of this section in computing a district’s building and facility gross square footage for purposes of determining payment amounts under this section. If any school district exceeds expenditure limitations prescribed by this subsection or fails to comply with expenditure levels for facility adequacy needs identified within its facility plan, the payments for that district in the immediately succeeding year shall be reduced by the excess expenditure amount including any excess expenditure of amounts accumulated under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 3, § 1; ch. 34, § 1; 1999, ch. 170, §§ 401, 402; 2001, ch. 139, § 324; ch. 191, §§ 1, 2; ch. 207, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 2; 2004, ch. 114, §§ 1, 2; ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 67, § 1; ch. 87, § 1; ch. 206, § 1; 2006, ch. 37, § 1, ch. 42, § 1; 2007, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 114, § 1; ch. 190, § 1; 2008, ch. 93, § 1; 2009, ch. 207, § 1; 2011, ch. 2, § 2; 2016 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 35, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 36, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 42, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 114, §§ 1 and 2, effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(ii), deleted “or leased by the district” preceding “including a school building” and inserted “owned by the district and”; in (a)(iv), deleted “personnel are employed or school buses are stored, maintained and serviced” at the end; in (a)(viii), substituted “in which” for “constructed solely to store,” and inserted “are stored, maintained or serviced” at the end of the paragraph; rewrote (c), modifying the major maintenance program and adjusting major maintenance square footage computations to reflect building age and to exclude specified leased space; repealed former (d), pertaining to gross square footage in excess of two hundred percent (200%) of the statewide minimum gross square footage criteria; rewrote (e), clarifying major maintenance reporting and expenditure requirements; and made stylistic changes.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, in (e), deleted “under W.S. 21-13-310(a)(xi)” following “not be reported as a local district revenue.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Subsection (e) is set out as amended by ch. 114 pursuant to Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, noted below.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 67, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (b), which formerly read: “On or before September 30 and March 31 of each school year, the school facilities commission shall distribute major building and facility repair and replacement payments to each school district from the capital construction account. Major building and facility repair and replacement payments shall be computed in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.”

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (e), substituted “Except as specified under subsection (f) of this section, expenditures from the separate account” for “Expenditures from the separate account”; and added (f).

The third 2005, amendment, by ch. 206, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added the third sentence in (e).

While none the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, in (c), deleted “unless the teacherage is used in support of a necessary small school as defined by W.S.

21-13-318

” following “excluding teacherages” in (ii)(C), deleted “with the district's kindergarten ADM divided by two (2)” at the end of the second sentence in (iii), and made related changes.

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, in (e), deleted “over the next five (5) years” following “replacement needs,” deleted “annually” following “updated,” and substituted “facility” for “five (5) year.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 1, § 1, added the last sentence in (e).

Laws 2007, ch. 1, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 13, 2007.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (c), added the exception at the end of the introductory language in (i)(A), inserted “buildings used for the provision of certified child care, developmental preschool and cooperative education programs pursuant to subparagraph (c)(i)(A) of this section” and similar language throughout the subsection; added (c)(i)(A)(I) through (c)(i)(A)(VI); and made a related change.

The third 2007 amendment, by ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (f), inserted the third sentence, inserted “and any amounts accumulated from year-to-year under this subsection” and inserted “including excess expenditures of amounts accumulated under this subsection” at the end of the paragraph.

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2008 amendment,

effective
July 1, 2008, substituted “or as prescribed by rule and regulation
of the commission otherwise in conformance with and satisfying the
requirements of this act” for “and as prescribed by
rule and regulation of the commission” in the second sentence
of (e).

The 2009 amendment,

effective
July 1, 2009, in (e), in the second sentence, deleted “or as
prescribed by rule and regulation of the commission otherwise in conformance
with and satisfying the requirements of this act,” following
“subsection (a) of this section”.

The 2011 amendment,

effective
July 1, 2011, substituted “department” for “commission”
and deleted “approval by the commission” and “determined
by the commission” throughout the section; in the introductory
language of (c)(i)(A), deleted “or” preceding “is
determined to be surplus”; in the eighth sentence of (e), inserted
“commission and the” preceding “select committee”;
and in the third sentence of (f), deleted “Effective for the
July 1, 2007 payment under this section and each payment thereafter”
at the beginning.

The first
2016 amendment

, by ch. 62 § 2, effective
July 1, 2016, inserted “including but not limited to the gross
square footage of any school building or facility leased by a charter
school operating pursuant to
W.S.

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

” following
“district” and “district’s” preceding
“lease agreement” in the first sentence of (c)(i)(B).

The second
2016 amendment, by ch. 105 § 3, effective
July 1, 2016, in the first sentence of (b), substituted “state
construction” for “school facilities” and made
a stylistic change.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(iii) added the last sentence; added (a)(iii)(A) through (C); rewrote (b); in (c)(i), deleted “Annually on or before September 1” from the beginning and inserted “from the prior school year” following “within the district”; in (c)(v), inserted “computed using data from August 1 of the prior school year” following “by the department,” substituted “edition of a nationally recognized, quarterly published construction” for “edition of the R. S. Means construction,” and inserted “that provides cost indices for elementary schools, junior high schools, high schools, offices and warehouses by city or town” following “construction cost index”; and made stylistic changes.

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (c)(i)(C), which read: “The district's total gross square footage shall be adjusted for the age of its buildings and facilities. The commission shall by rule and regulation for buildings and facilities constructed after June 30, 2004, adjust total district gross square footage by excluding or reducing the gross square footage of newly constructed buildings and facilities whereby at the seventh school year immediately following the school year in which the building or facility is constructed, one hundred percent (100%) of the gross square footage of the newly constructed building or facility is included within the total district square footage computation under this section.”

The third 2018 amendment, by ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (c)(iii), in the first sentence, added “Except as otherwise provided by this paragraph, adjust,” substituted “section by excluding” for “section shall be adjusted by excluding,” and deleted “but excluding the gross square footage of buildings used for the provision of certified child care, developmental preschool and cooperative education programs pursuant to subparagraph (c)(i)(A) of this section” following “footage of portable buildings,” added the second sentence, and made stylistic changes.”

The fourth 2018 amendment, by ch. 36, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (c)(iii)(A), which read: “For school years 2004-2005 and 2005-2006, up to one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the per student gross square footage criteria prescribed by statewide adequacy standards” and former (c)(iii)(B), which read: “For school years 2006-2007 through 2008-2009, up to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the prescribed per student gross square footage criteria.

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, deleted "on July 1 of each year" following "To the extent funds are available", "seventy-five percent (75%) of the" following "distribute", the second sentence which read: "On or before September 30 of each year the department shall distribute the balance of payments to each school district", inserted "quarterly installments" following "replacement payments", substituted "any quarterly payment" for "payments of any school year", added the second sentence and added "for that quarter" following "all payments" in (b).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 114, § 3, directs that, effective for school year 2004-2005 only and notwithstanding W.S. 21-15-109(c)(i)(D) and (e), as amended by section 1 of the act, a school district may dedicate up to eight percent (8%) of amounts distributed under W.S. 21-15-109(b) and deposited within the separate account maintained and required under W.S. 21-15-109(e), for building and facility repair and replacement needs of the district which are not specified within the district's facility plan, including expenditures for maintenance needs of district enhancements. These expenditures are authorized during the period in which the select committee on school facilities develops state policy and school district mechanisms to address school district enhancements to school buildings and facilities beyond state adequacy standards.

Laws 2007, ch. 114, § 2, states:

“In approving district square footage of closed or surplus buildings leased to child care programs, developmental preschool programs, and programs and services provided by boards of cooperative education services pursuant to W.S.

21-15-109

(c)(i)(A), as amended by section 1 of this act, the commission shall limit total amounts payable from the capital construction account for this purpose during school year 2007-2008 to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00). The commission shall make a pro rata reduction to district payments under W.S.

21-15-109

if for school year 2007-2008, amounts computed solely under application of section 1 of this act exceed the maximum prescribed by this section.”

Laws 2018, ch. 35, § 3, provides: “The provision of this act that requires the state construction department to increase or reduce a subsequent school district major maintenance payment in the event a school district receives an excessive or deficient distribution shall not apply to major maintenance distributions made to school districts prior to the effective date of this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-15-111(a)(viii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 21-15-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1998, ch. 3, § 1, related to building and facility repair and replacement advances.